Vermont, session 2025-2026, S71.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. chapter 61A is added to read:
CHAPTER 61A. DATA PRIVACY
Subchapter 1. Vermont Data Privacy and Online Surveillance Act
§ 2415a. SHORT TITLE AND DEFINITIONS
(a) Short title. This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the
“Vermont Data Privacy and Online Surveillance Act.”
(b) Definitions. As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) “Affiliate” means a legal entity that shares common branding
with another legal entity or controls, is controlled by, or is under common
control with another legal entity.
(B) As used in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (1), “control” or
“controlled” means:
(i) ownership of, or the power to vote, more than 50 percent of the
outstanding shares of any class of voting security of a company;
(ii) control in any manner over the election of a majority of the
directors or of individuals exercising similar functions; or
(iii) the power to exercise controlling influence over the
management of a company.
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 2 of 54
2026
(2) “Authenticate” means to use reasonable means to determine that a
request to exercise any of the rights afforded under subdivisions 2415d(a)(1)–
(4) of this subchapter is being made by, or on behalf of, the consumer who is
entitled to exercise the consumer rights with respect to the personal data at
issue.
(3)(A) “Biometric data” means data generated from the technological
processing of an individual’s unique biological, physical, or physiological
characteristics that are collected on or used to identify a specific consumer,
including:
(i) iris or retina scans;
(ii) fingerprints;
(iii) facial or hand mapping, geometry, or templates;
(iv) vein patterns;
(v) voice prints or vocal biomarkers; and
(vi) gait or personally identifying physical movement or patterns.
(B) “Biometric data” does not include:
(i) a digital or physical photograph;
(ii) an audio or video recording; or
(iii) any data generated from a digital or physical photograph or an
audio or video recording, unless such data is generated to identify a specific
individual.
(4) “Business associate” has the same meaning as in HIPAA.
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 3 of 54
2026
(5) “Child” has the same meaning as in COPPA.
(6)(A) “Collect,” “collected,” or “collection” means buying, renting,
gathering, obtaining, receiving, or accessing any personal data by any means,
other than such activities between a controller and a processor or between a
processor and its subcontractors.
(B) “Collect,” “collected,” or “collection” includes receiving data
from the consumer, either actively or passively, or by observing the
consumer’s behavior.
(7)(A) “Consent” means a clear affirmative act signifying a consumer’s
freely given, specific, informed, and unambiguous agreement to allow the
processing of personal data relating to the consumer.
(B) “Consent” may include a written statement, including by
electronic means, or any other unambiguous affirmative action.
(C) “Consent” does not include:
(i) acceptance of a general or broad terms of use or similar
document that contains descriptions of personal data processing along with
other, unrelated information;
(ii) hovering over, muting, pausing, or closing a given piece of
content; or
(iii) agreement obtained through the use of dark patterns.
(8)(A) “Consumer” means an individual who is a resident of the State.
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 4 of 54
2026
(B) “Consumer” does not include an individual acting in a
commercial or employment context or as an employee, owner, director, officer,
or contractor of a company, partnership, sole proprietorship, nonprofit
organization, or government agency whose communications or transactions
with the controller occur solely within the context of that individual’s role with
the company, partnership, sole proprietorship, nonprofit organization, or
government agency.
(9) “Consumer health data” means any personal data that a controller
uses to identify a consumer’s physical or mental health condition, diagnosis, or
status, including gender-affirming health data and reproductive or sexual
health data.
(10) “Consumer health data controller” means any controller that, alone
or jointly with others, determines the purpose and means of processing
consumer health data.
(11) “Consumer reporting agency” has the same meaning as in the Fair
Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. § 1681a(f).
(12) “Controller” means a person who, alone or jointly with others,
determines the purpose and means of processing personal data.
(13) “COPPA” means the Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act of
1998, 15 U.S.C. §§ 6501–6506, and any regulations, rules, guidance, and
exemptions adopted pursuant to the act, as the act and regulations, rules,
guidance, and exemptions may be amended.
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 5 of 54
2026
(14) “Covered entity” has the same meaning as in HIPAA.
(15) “Credit union” has the same meaning as in 8 V.S.A. § 30101.
(16) “Dark pattern” means a user interface designed or manipulated with
the substantial effect of subverting or impairing user autonomy, decision
making, or choice and includes any practice the Federal Trade Commission
refers to as a “dark pattern.”
(17) “Decision that produces any legal or similarly significant effect”
means any decision made by the controller, or on behalf of the controller, that
results in the provision or denial by the controller of any financial or lending
service, any housing, any insurance, any education enrollment or opportunity,
any criminal justice, any employment opportunity, or any health care service.
(18) “Deidentified data” means data that does not identify and cannot
reasonably be used to infer information about, or otherwise be linked to, an
identified or identifiable individual, or a device linked to the individual, if the
controller that possesses the data:
(A)(i) takes reasonable measures to ensure that the data cannot be
used to reidentify an identified or identifiable individual or be associated with
an individual or device that identifies or is linked or reasonably linkable to an
individual; and
(ii) for purposes of this subdivision (A), “reasonable measures”
includes the deidentification requirements set forth under 45 C.F.R § 164.514
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 6 of 54
2026
(other requirements relating to uses and disclosures of protected health
information);
(B) publicly commits to process the data only in a deidentified
fashion and not attempt to reidentify the data; and
(C) contractually obligates any recipients of the data to comply with
all provisions of this subchapter.
(19) “Derived data” means data that is created by the derivation of
information, data, assumptions, correlations, inferences, predictions, or
conclusions from facts, evidence, or another source of information or data
about a consumer’s device.
(20) “Gender-affirming health care services” has the same meaning as in
1 V.S.A. § 150.
(21) “Gender-affirming health data” means any personal data
concerning a past, present, or future effort made by a consumer to seek, or a
consumer’s receipt of, gender-affirming health care services.
(22) “Genetic data” means any data, regardless of its format, that results
from the analysis of a biological sample of an individual, or from another
source enabling equivalent information to be obtained, and concerns genetic
material, including deoxyribonucleic acids (DNA), ribonucleic acids (RNA),
genes, chromosomes, alleles, genomes, alterations or modifications to DNA or
RNA, single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs), epigenetic markers,
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 7 of 54
2026
uninterpreted data that results from analysis of the biological sample or other
source, and any information extrapolated, derived, or inferred therefrom.
(23) “Geofence” means any technology that uses global positioning
coordinates, cell tower connectivity, cellular data, radio frequency
identification, wireless fidelity technology data, or any other form of location
detection, or any combination of such coordinates, connectivity, data,
identification, or other form of location detection, to establish a virtual
boundary.
(24) “Health care facility” has the same meaning as in 18 V.S.A. § 9432.
(25) “HIPAA” means the Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-191, as may be amended.
(26) “Hybrid entity” has the same meaning as in HIPAA.
(27) “Identified or identifiable individual” means an individual who can
be readily identified, directly or indirectly, including by reference to an
identifier such as a name, an identification number, precise geolocation data, or
an online identifier.
(28) “Institution of higher education” means any individual who, or
school, board, association, limited liability company, or corporation that, is
licensed or accredited to offer one or more programs of higher learning leading
to one or more degrees.
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 8 of 54
2026
(29) “Mental health facility” means any health care facility in which at
least 70 percent of the health care services provided in the facility are mental
health services.
(30) “Minor” means any consumer who is younger than 18 years of age.
(31) “Neural data” means any information that is generated by
measuring the activity of an individual’s central nervous system.
(32) “Nonprofit organization” means any organization that is qualified
for tax exempt status under I.R.C. § 501(c)(3), 501(c)(4), 501(c)(6), or
501(c)(12), or any corresponding internal revenue code of the United States, as
may be amended.
(33) “Patient-identifying information” has the same meaning as in
42 C.F.R. § 2.11 (confidentiality of substance use disorder patient records).
(34) “Person” means an individual, association, company, limited
liability company, corporation, partnership, sole proprietorship, trust, or other
legal entity.
(35)(A) “Personal data” means any information, including derived data
and unique identifiers, that is linked or reasonably linkable, alone or in
combination with other information, to an identified or identifiable individual
or to a device that identifies, is linked to, or is reasonably linkable to one or
more identified or identifiable individuals.
(B) “Personal data” does not include deidentified data or publicly
available information.
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 9 of 54
2026
(36)(A) “Precise geolocation data” means information derived from
technology, including global positioning system level latitude and longitude
coordinates or other mechanisms, that directly identifies the specific location
of an individual with precision and accuracy within a radius of 1,750 feet.
(B) “Precise geolocation data” does not include:
(i) the content of communications;
(ii) data generated by or connected to an advanced utility metering
infrastructure system; or
(iii) data generated by equipment used by a utility company.
(37) “Process” or “processing” means any operation or set of operations
performed, whether by manual or automated means, on personal data or on sets
of personal data, such as the collection, use, storage, disclosure, analysis,
deletion, or modification of personal data.
(38) “Processor” means a person who collects or processes personal data
on behalf of:
(A) a controller; or
(B) another processor.
(39) “Profiling” means any form of automated processing performed on
personal data to evaluate, analyze, or predict personal aspects, including an
individual’s economic situation, health, personal preferences, interests,
reliability, behavior, location, movements, or identifying characteristics.
(40) “Protected health information” has the same meaning as in HIPAA.
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 10 of 54
2026
(41) “Pseudonymous data” means personal data that cannot be attributed
to a specific individual without the use of additional information, provided the
additional information is kept separately and is subject to appropriate technical
and organizational measures to ensure that the personal data are not attributed
to an identified or identifiable individual.
(42)(A) “Publicly available information” means information that:
(i) is made available through federal, state, or local government
records or to the general public from widely distributed media; or
(ii) a controller has a reasonable basis to believe that the consumer
has lawfully made available to the general public.
(B) “Publicly available information” does not include:
(i) biometric data collected by a business about a consumer
without the consumer’s knowledge;
(ii) information that is collated and combined to create a consumer
profile that is made available to a user of a publicly available website either in
exchange for payment or free of charge;
(iii) an inference that is generated from the information described
in subdivision (ii) of this subdivision (42)(B);
(iv) solely for the purposes set forth in subdivisions 2415d(a)(1),
(2), and (4) of this subchapter, information that is made available for sale;
(v) any obscene visual depiction, as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 1460;
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 11 of 54
2026
(vi) personal data that is created through the combination of
personal data with publicly available information;
(vii) genetic data, unless otherwise made publicly available by the
consumer to whom the information pertains;
(viii) information provided by a consumer on a website or online
service made available to all members of the public, for free or for a fee, where
the consumer has maintained a reasonable expectation of privacy in the
information, such as by restricting the information to a specific audience; or
(ix) intimate images, authentic or computer generated, known to
be nonconsensual.
(43) “Reproductive or sexual health care” has the same meaning as
“reproductive health care services” in 1 V.S.A. § 150(c).
(44) “Reproductive or sexual health data” means any personal data
concerning an effort made by a consumer to seek, or a consumer’s receipt of,
reproductive or sexual health care.
(45) “Reproductive or sexual health facility” means any health care
facility in which at least 70 percent of the health care–related services or
products rendered or provided in the facility are reproductive or sexual health
care.
(46)(A) “Sale of personal data” means the exchange of a consumer’s
personal data by the controller with a third party for monetary or other valuable
consideration.
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 12 of 54
2026
(B) “Sale of personal data” does not include:
(i) the disclosure of personal data to a processor that processes the
personal data on behalf of the controller;
(ii) the disclosure of personal data to a third party for purposes of
providing a product or service requested by the consumer;
(iii) the disclosure or transfer of personal data to an affiliate of the
controller;
(iv) the disclosure of personal data when the consumer directs the
controller to disclose the personal data or intentionally uses the controller to
interact with a third party;
(v) the disclosure of personal data that the consumer:
(I) intentionally made available to the general public via a
channel of mass media; and
(II) did not restrict to a specific audience; or
(vi) the disclosure or transfer of personal data to a third party as an
asset that is part of a merger, acquisition, bankruptcy, or other transaction, or a
proposed merger, acquisition, bankruptcy, or other transaction, in which the
third party assumes control of all or part of the controller’s assets.
(47) “Sensitive data” means personal data that includes:
(A) data revealing:
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 13 of 54
2026
(i) racial or ethnic origin, religious beliefs, sex life, sexual
orientation, status as nonbinary or transgender, or citizenship or immigration
status; or
(ii) a mental or physical health condition, diagnosis, disability, or
treatment;
(B) consumer health data;
(C) genetic or biometric data or information derived therefrom;
(D) personal data collected from an individual the controller has
actual knowledge, or willfully disregards, is a child;
(E) precise geolocation data;
(F) neural data;
(G) a consumer’s financial account number, financial account login
information, or credit card or debit card number that, in combination with any
required access or security code, password, or credential, would allow access
to a consumer’s financial account; or
(H) a government-issued identification number, including, but not
limited to, Social Security number, passport number, State identification card
number, or driver’s license number, that applicable law does not require to be
publicly displayed.
(48)(A) “Targeted advertising” means displaying advertisements to a
consumer where the advertisement is selected based on personal data obtained
or inferred from that consumer’s activities over time and across nonaffiliated
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 14 of 54
2026
websites or online applications to predict the consumer’s preferences or
interests.
(B) “Targeted advertising” does not include:
(i) an advertisement based on activities within the controller’s own
website or online application;
(ii) an advertisement based on the context of a consumer’s current
search query or visit to a website or online application;
(iii) an advertisement directed to a consumer in response to the
consumer’s request for information or feedback; or
(iv) processing of personal data solely to measure or report
advertising frequency, performance, or reach.
(49) “Third party” means a person, public authority, agency, or body,
other than the consumer, controller, or processor or an affiliate of the processor
or the controller.
(50) “Trade secret” has the same meaning as in section 4601 of this title.
§ 2415b. APPLICABILITY
(a) Thresholds. Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, this
subchapter applies to a person that conducts business in this State or a person
that produces products or services that are targeted to residents of this State
and that during the preceding calendar year:
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 15 of 54
2026
(1) controlled or processed the personal data of not fewer than 35,000
consumers, excluding personal data controlled or processed solely for the
purpose of completing a payment transaction;
(2) controlled or processed the sensitive data of not fewer than 3,000
consumers, excluding personal data controlled or processed solely for the
purposes of completing a payment transaction; or
(3) offered for sale in trade or commerce the personal data of not fewer
than 3,000 consumers.
(b) Health data applicability. Section 2415k of this subchapter and the
provisions of this subchapter concerning consumer health data and consumer
health data controllers apply to a person that conducts business in this State or
a person that produces products or services that are targeted to residents of this
State.
(c) Controlling law. In the event of a conflict between the provisions of
this subchapter and any other law, including the Vermont Age-Appropriate
Design Code Act, the provisions of the law that afford the greatest protection
for the right of privacy for consumers shall control.
§ 2415c. EXEMPTIONS
(a) This subchapter does not apply to:
(1) in the ordinary course of its operation, a federal, state, tribal, or local
government entity or an instrumentality of the State;
(2)(A) a covered entity that is not a hybrid entity;
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 16 of 54
2026
(B) any health care component of a hybrid entity; or
(C) a business associate;
(3) patient-identifying information, for purposes of 42 U.S.C. § 290DD–
2;
(4)(A) information to the extent it is used for public health, community
health, or population health activities and purposes, as authorized by HIPAA,
when provided by or to a covered entity or when provided by or to a business
associate in accordance with the business associate agreement with a covered
entity;
(B) information that is a health care record, as that term is defined in
18 V.S.A. § 9419, if the information is held by an entity that is a covered entity
or business associate under HIPAA because it collects, uses, or discloses
protected health information;
(C) information that is deidentified in accordance with the
requirements for deidentification set forth in 45 C.F.R. § 164.514 and that is
derived from individually identifiable health information as described in
HIPAA; and
(D) personal information consistent with the human subject
protection requirements of the U.S. Food and Drug Administration;
(5) information used only for public health activities and purposes
described in 45 C.F.R. § 164.512 (disclosure of protected health information
without authorization);
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 17 of 54
2026
(6) information that identifies a consumer in connection with:
(A) activities that are subject to the Federal Policy for the Protection
of Human Subjects, codified as 45 C.F.R. Part 46 (HHS protection of human
subjects) and in various other federal regulations;
(B) activities that are subject to the protections provided in 21 C.F.R.
Parts 50 (FDA clinical investigations protection of human subjects) and
56 (FDA clinical investigations institutional review boards); or
(C) research conducted in accordance with the requirements set forth
in subdivisions (A) and (B) of this subdivision (a)(6) or otherwise in
accordance with applicable law;
(7) patient-identifying information that is collected and processed in
accordance with 42 C.F.R. Part 2 (confidentiality of substance use disorder
patient records);
(8) patient safety work product that is created and used for purposes of
patient safety improvement in accordance with 42 C.F.R. § 3, established in
accordance with 42 U.S.C. §§ 299b–21 through 299b–26;
(9) information or documents created for the purposes of the Healthcare
Quality Improvement Act of 1986, 42 U.S.C. §§ 11101–11152, and regulations
adopted to implement that act;
(10) information processed or maintained solely in connection with, and
for the purpose of, enabling notice of an emergency to persons that an
individual specifies;
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 18 of 54
2026
(11) any activity that involves collecting, maintaining, disclosing,
selling, communicating, or using information for the purpose of evaluating a
consumer’s creditworthiness, credit standing, credit capacity, character,
general reputation, personal characteristics, or mode of living if done strictly in
accordance with the provisions of the Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C.
§§ 1681–1681x, as may be amended, by:
(A) a consumer reporting agency;
(B) a person who furnishes information to a consumer reporting
agency under 15 U.S.C. § 1681s-2 (responsibilities of furnishers of
information to consumer reporting agencies); or
(C) a person who uses a consumer report as provided in 15 U.S.C.
§ 1681b(a)(3) (permissible purposes of consumer reports);
(12) information collected, processed, sold, or disclosed under and in
accordance with the following laws and regulations:
(A) the Driver’s Privacy Protection Act of 1994, 18 U.S.C. §§ 2721–
2725;
(B) data that is subject to the Family Educational Rights and Privacy
Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g, and regulations adopted to implement that act;
(C) data that is subject to the Airline Deregulation Act, Pub. L. No.
95-504, only to the extent that an air carrier collects information related to
prices, routes, or services, and only to the extent that the provisions of the
Airline Deregulation Act preempt this subchapter;
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 19 of 54
2026
(D) data that is subject to the Farm Credit Act, Pub. L. No. 92-181, as
may be amended; and
(E) data that is subject to federal policy under 21 U.S.C. § 830
(regulation of listed chemicals and certain machines);
(13) data subject to Title V of the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act, Pub. L. No.
106-102, and regulations adopted to implement that act;
(14) a state- or federally chartered bank or credit union, or an affiliate or
subsidiary that is principally engaged in financial activities, as described in
12 U.S.C. § 1843(k);
(15) an agent, broker-dealer, investment adviser, or investment adviser
representative, as those terms are defined in section 5102 of this title, who is
regulated by the Department of Financial Regulation or the Securities and
Exchange Commission;
(16) a person regulated pursuant to 8 V.S.A. part 3 (chapters 101–165)
other than a person who, alone or in combination with another person,
establishes and maintains a self-insurance program and who does not otherwise
engage in the business of entering into policies of insurance;
(17) health care providers and health care facilities, as those terms are
defined in 18 V.S.A. § 9402, provided such providers and facilities maintain
all protected health information in accordance with the requirements of
18 V.S.A. § 1881 and HIPAA regardless of whether such providers or facilities
are covered entities under 45 C.F.R. § 160.103;
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 20 of 54
2026
(18) protected health information under HIPAA;
(19) a third-party administrator, as that term is defined in the Third Party
Administrator Rule adopted pursuant to 18 V.S.A. § 9417, provided that the
third-party administrator is subject to and in compliance with the Department
of Financial Regulation’s Regulation IH-2001-01 (Privacy of Consumer
Financial and Health Information);
(20) personal data of a victim or witness of child abuse, domestic
violence, human trafficking, sexual assault, violent felony, or stalking that a
victim services organization collects, processes, or maintains in the course of
its operation;
(21) a nonprofit organization that is established to detect and prevent
fraudulent acts in connection with insurance;
(22) information that is processed for purposes of compliance,
enrollment or degree verification, or research services by a nonprofit
organization that is established to provide enrollment data reporting services
on behalf of postsecondary schools as that term is defined in 16 V.S.A. § 176;
(23) noncommercial activity of:
(A) a publisher, editor, reporter, or other person who is connected
with or employed by a newspaper, magazine, periodical, newsletter, pamphlet,
report, or other publication in general circulation;
(B) a radio or television station that holds a license issued by the
Federal Communications Commission;
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 21 of 54
2026
(C) a nonprofit organization that provides programming to radio or
television networks; or
(D) a press association or wire service; or
(24) data processed or maintained:
(A) in the course of an individual applying to, employed by, or acting
as an agent or independent contractor of a controller, processor, consumer
health data controller, or third party, to the extent that the data is collected and
used within the context of that role;
(B) as the emergency contact information of a consumer pursuant to
this subchapter, used for emergency contact purposes; or
(C) that is necessary to retain to administer benefits for another
individual relating to the individual who is the subject of the information
pursuant to subdivision (18) of this subsection (a) and used for the purposes of
administering such benefits.
(b) Controllers, processors, and consumer health data controllers that
comply with the verifiable parental consent requirements of COPPA shall be
deemed compliant with any obligation to obtain parental consent pursuant to
this subchapter.
§ 2415d. CONSUMER PERSONAL DATA RIGHTS
(a) Consumer rights. A consumer shall have the right to:
(1) confirm whether or not a controller is processing the consumer’s
personal data and access such personal data, including any inferences about the
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 22 of 54
2026
consumer derived from such personal data and whether a controller or
processor is processing a consumer’s personal data for the purposes of
profiling to make a decision that produces any legal or similarly significant
effect concerning a consumer, unless such confirmation or access would
require the controller to reveal a trade secret or the controller is prohibited
from disclosing such personal data under subsection (e) of this section;
(2) correct inaccuracies in the consumer’s personal data, taking into
account the nature of the personal data and the purposes of the processing of
the consumer’s personal data;
(3) delete personal data provided by, or obtained about, the consumer;
(4) obtain a copy of the consumer’s personal data processed by the
controller, in a portable and, to the extent technically feasible, readily usable
format that allows the consumer to transmit the data to another controller
without hindrance, where the processing is carried out by automated means,
provided the controller shall not be required to reveal any trade secret;
(5) opt out of the processing of the personal data for purposes of:
(A) targeted advertising;
(B) the sale of personal data, except as provided in subsection
2415e(b) of this subchapter; or
(C) profiling in furtherance of any automated decision that produces
any legal or similarly significant effect concerning the consumer;
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 23 of 54
2026
(6) if the consumer’s personal data were processed for the purposes of
profiling in furtherance of any automated decision that produced any legal or
similarly significant effect concerning the consumer, and if feasible:
(A) question the result of such profiling;
(B) be informed of the reason that such profiling resulted in such
decision;
(C) review the consumer’s personal data that were processed for the
purposes of such profiling; and
(D) if the profiling decision concerned housing, taking into account
the nature of the personal data and the purposes for which such personal data
were processed, be allowed to correct any incorrect personal data that were
processed for the purposes of such profiling and have the profiling decision
reevaluated based on the corrected personal data; and
(7) obtain from the controller a list of the third parties to which such
controller has sold the consumer’s personal data or, if such controller does not
maintain a list of the third parties to which such controller has sold the
consumer’s personal data, a list of all third parties to which such controller has
sold personal data, provided the controller shall not be required to reveal any
trade secret.
(b) Exercising consumer rights.
(1) A consumer may exercise rights under this section by a secure and
reliable means established by the controller and described to the consumer in
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 24 of 54
2026
the controller’s privacy notice pursuant to subsection 2415e(c) of this
subchapter.
(2)(A) A consumer may designate another person to serve as the
consumer’s authorized agent, and act on the consumer’s behalf, to opt out of
the processing of the consumer’s personal data for the purposes specified in
subsection (a) of this section.
(B) The consumer may designate an authorized agent by way of,
among other things, a technology, including an internet link or a browser
setting, browser extension, or global device setting, indicating the consumer’s
intent to opt out of the processing.
(C) A controller shall comply with an opt-out request received from
an authorized agent if the controller is able to verify, with commercially
reasonable effort, the identity of the consumer and the authorized agent’s
authority to act on the consumer’s behalf.
(3) In the case of processing personal data of a consumer who:
(A) a controller has actual knowledge, or willfully disregards, is a
child, the parent or legal guardian may exercise the consumer rights on the
child’s behalf; and
(B) is subject to a guardianship, conservatorship, or other protective
arrangement, the guardian or the conservator of the consumer may exercise the
rights on the consumer’s behalf.
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 25 of 54
2026
(c) Controller compliance. Except as otherwise provided in this
subchapter, a controller shall comply with a request by a consumer to exercise
the consumer rights authorized pursuant to this subchapter as follows:
(1) Timeline to respond. A controller:
(A) shall respond to the consumer without undue delay, but not later
than 45 days after receipt of the request; and
(B) may extend the response period by 45 additional days when
reasonably necessary, considering the complexity and number of the
consumer’s requests, provided the controller informs the consumer of the
extension within the initial 45-day response period and of the reason for the
extension.
(2) Declining to take action. If a controller declines to take action
regarding the consumer’s request, the controller shall inform the consumer
without undue delay, but not later than 45 days after receipt of the request, of
the justification for declining to take action and instructions for how to appeal
the decision.
(3) Cost of information.
(A) Information provided by a controller in response to a consumer
request shall be provided by the controller, free of charge, once per consumer
during any 12-month period.
(B) If requests from a consumer are manifestly unfounded, excessive,
or repetitive, the controller may charge the consumer a reasonable fee to cover
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 26 of 54
2026
the administrative costs of complying with the request or decline to act on the
request.
(C) The controller bears the burden of demonstrating the manifestly
unfounded, excessive, or repetitive nature of the request.
(4) Authentication of request.
(A) If a controller is unable to authenticate a request to exercise any
of the rights afforded under subdivisions (a)(1)–(4) of this section using
commercially reasonable efforts, the controller shall not be required to comply
with a request to initiate an action pursuant to this section and shall provide
notice to the consumer that the controller is unable to authenticate the request
to exercise the right or rights until the consumer provides additional
information reasonably necessary to authenticate the consumer and the
consumer’s request to exercise the right or rights.
(B) A controller shall not be required to authenticate an opt-out
request, but a controller may deny an opt-out request if the controller has a
good faith, reasonable, and documented belief that the request is fraudulent.
(C) If a controller denies an opt-out request because the controller
believes the request is fraudulent, the controller shall send a notice to the
person who made the request disclosing that the controller believes the request
is fraudulent, why the controller believes the request is fraudulent, and that the
controller shall not comply with the request.
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 27 of 54
2026
(5) Third-party data. A controller that has obtained personal data about
a consumer from a source other than the consumer shall be deemed in
compliance with a consumer’s request to delete the consumer’s data pursuant
to subdivision (a)(3) of this section by:
(A) retaining a record of the deletion request and the minimum data
necessary for the purpose of ensuring the consumer’s personal data remains
deleted from the controller’s records and not using the retained data for any
other purpose pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter; or
(B) opting the consumer out of the processing of the personal data for
any purpose except for those exempted pursuant to the provisions of this
subchapter.
(d) Appeals.
(1) A controller shall establish a process for a consumer to appeal the
controller’s refusal to take action on a request pursuant to this section within a
reasonable period of time after the consumer’s receipt of the decision.
(2) The appeal process shall be conspicuously available and similar to
the process for submitting requests to initiate action pursuant to this section.
(3) Not later than 60 days after receipt of an appeal, a controller shall
inform the consumer in writing of any action taken or not taken in response to
the appeal, including a written explanation of the reasons for the decisions.
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 28 of 54
2026
(4) If the controller denies the appeal, the controller shall also provide
the consumer with an online mechanism, if available, or other method through
which the consumer may contact the Attorney General to submit a complaint.
(e) Disclosure of certain information. A controller shall not disclose the
following personal data in response to a request to exercise the consumer’s
rights pursuant to subdivision (a)(1) of this section and shall instead inform the
consumer or the person exercising such right on behalf of the consumer, with
sufficient particularity, that the controller has collected the consumer’s:
(1) Social Security number;
(2) driver’s license number, State identification card number, or other
government-issued identification number;
(3) financial account number;
(4) health insurance identification number or medical identification
number;
(5) account password;
(6) security question or answer thereto; or
(7) biometric data.
§ 2415e. DUTIES OF CONTROLLERS
(a) Data collection and processing. A controller shall:
(1) limit the collection of a consumer’s personal data to what is
reasonably necessary and proportionate in relation to the purposes for which
the data are processed, as disclosed to the consumer;
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 29 of 54
2026
(2) not process a consumer’s personal data for any material new purpose
that is neither reasonably necessary to, nor compatible with, the purposes for
which the data were processed pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection,
unless the controller receives consent from the consumer;
(3) establish, implement, and maintain reasonable administrative,
technical, and physical data security practices to protect the confidentiality,
integrity, and accessibility of personal data appropriate to the volume and
nature of the personal data at issue;
(4) regarding the sensitive data of a consumer:
(A) not process the sensitive data unless the consumer has provided
consent and unless the processing is reasonably necessary in relation to the
purposes for which the sensitive data are collected;
(B) not sell the sensitive data unless the consumer has provided
consent; and
(C) if the controller has actual knowledge, or willfully disregards,
that the consumer is a child, process the sensitive data in accordance with:
(i) COPPA; and
(ii) if applicable, section 2449f of this title;
(5) not process personal data in violation of any:
(A) law of this State that prohibits unlawful discrimination against
consumers and any evidence, or lack of evidence, concerning proactive
antibias testing or any similar proactive effort to avoid processing data in
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 30 of 54
2026
violation of any such law, including any evidence or lack of evidence
concerning the quality, efficacy, recency, and scope of any testing or effort, the
results of which shall be relevant to any claim available for a violation of such
law and any defense available thereto; or
(B) federal law that prohibits unlawful discrimination against
consumers;
(6) provide an effective mechanism for a consumer to revoke the
consumer’s consent under this section that is at least as easy as the mechanism
by which the consumer provided the consumer’s consent and, upon revocation
of the consent, cease to process the data as soon as practicable, but not later
than 15 days after the receipt of the request;
(7) subject to subdivision (9) of this subsection, if a controller has actual
knowledge, and willfully disregards, that a consumer is at least 13 years of age
but younger than 18 years of age:
(A) not process the personal data of the consumer for purposes of
targeted advertising; and
(B) not sell the consumer’s personal data;
(8) not discriminate against a consumer for exercising any of the
consumer rights contained in this subchapter, including denying goods or
services, charging different prices or rates for goods or services, or providing a
different level of quality of goods or services to the consumer; and
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 31 of 54
2026
(9) if the controller is a covered business and the consumer is a covered
minor as both terms are defined in section 2449a of this title, comply with the
requirements set forth in chapter 62, subchapter 6 of this title (Vermont Age-
Appropriate Design Code Act).
(b) Limitations. Subsection (a) of this section shall not be construed to:
(1) require a controller to provide a product or service that requires the
personal data of a consumer that the controller does not collect or maintain; or
(2) prohibit a controller from offering a different price, rate, level,
quality, or selection of goods or services to a consumer, including offering
goods or services for no fee if the offering is in connection with a consumer’s
voluntary participation in a bona fide loyalty, rewards, premium features,
discounts, or club card program.
(c) Privacy notice.
(1) A controller shall provide consumers with a reasonably accessible,
clear, and meaningful privacy notice that includes:
(A) the categories of personal data processed by the controller;
(B) the purpose for processing personal data and a description of the
processing, pursuant to subdivision (a)(1) of this section;
(C) a description of the means, established pursuant to subsection (d)
of this section, for consumers to submit requests to exercise their consumer
rights pursuant to this subchapter, including a description of how consumers
may:
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 32 of 54
2026
(i) exercise a consumer’s rights under subsection 2415d(a) of this
subchapter; and
(ii) appeal a controller’s decisions with regard to requests to
exercise such rights;
(D) the categories of personal data that the controller sells to third
parties, if any;
(E) the categories of third parties, if any, to which the controller sells
personal data;
(F) a clear and conspicuous disclosure of any:
(i) processing of personal data for purposes of targeted
advertising; or
(ii) sale of personal data to a third party for purposes of targeted
advertising;
(G) an active email address or other online mechanism that the
consumer may use to contact the controller;
(H) a statement disclosing whether the controller collects, uses, or
sells personal data for the purpose of training large language models; and
(I) the most recent month and year during which the controller
updated the privacy notice.
(2) A controller shall make the privacy notice required under
subdivision (1) of this subsection publicly available:
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 33 of 54
2026
(A) through a conspicuous hyperlink that includes the word
“privacy”:
(i) on the home page of the controller’s website, if the controller
maintains a website;
(ii) on the application store page or download page of a mobile
device, if the controller maintains an application for use on a mobile device;
and
(iii) on the application’s settings menu or in a similarly
conspicuous and accessible location, if the controller maintains an application
for use on a mobile device or other device used to connect to the internet;
(B) through a medium in which the controller regularly interacts with
consumers, including mail, if the controller does not maintain a website;
(C) in each language in which the controller:
(i) provides any product or service that is subject to the privacy
notice; or
(ii) carries out any activity that is related to any product or service
described in subdivision (i) of this subdivision (C); and
(D) in a manner that is reasonably accessible to, and usable by,
individuals with disabilities.
(3) Whenever a controller makes any retroactive material change to the
controller’s privacy notice or practices, the controller shall:
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 34 of 54
2026
(A) notify the consumers affected by such material change with
respect to any personal data to be collected after the effective date of such
material change;
(B) provide a reasonable opportunity for the consumers described in
subdivision (A) of this subdivision (3) to withdraw consent to any further and
materially different collection, processing, or transfer of previously collected
personal data following such material change; and
(C) take all reasonable electronic measures to provide the notice set
forth in this subdivision (3) to the affected consumers, taking into account the
technology available to the controller and the nature of the controller’s
relationship with such affected consumers.
(4) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to require a controller
to provide a privacy notice that is specific to this State if the controller
provides a generally applicable privacy notice that satisfies the requirements
established in this subsection.
(d) Providing consumers access to exercise rights.
(1) A controller shall:
(A) establish and describe in a privacy notice, one or more secure and
reliable means for consumers to submit a request to exercise their consumer
rights pursuant to this subchapter; and
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 35 of 54
2026
(B) not require a consumer to create a new account in order to
exercise consumer rights but may require a consumer to use an existing
account.
(2) The means pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection shall:
(A) take into account the ways in which consumers normally interact
with the controller, the need for secure and reliable communication of the
requests, and the ability of the controller to verify the identity of the consumer
making the request;
(B) provide a clear and conspicuous link on the controller’s website
to a web page that enables a consumer, or an agent of the consumer, to opt out
of the processing of the consumer’s personal data for purposes of targeted
advertising or any sale of the consumer’s personal data; and
(C) allow a consumer to opt out of any processing of the consumer’s
personal data for the purposes of targeted advertising, or any sale of the
personal data, through an opt-out preference signal sent to the controller with
the consumer’s consent indicating the consumer’s intent to opt out of any of
the processing or sale, by a platform, technology, or other mechanism that
shall:
(i) not unfairly disadvantage another controller;
(ii) not make use of a default setting, but rather require the
consumer to make an affirmative, freely given, and unambiguous choice to opt
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 36 of 54
2026
out of any processing of the consumer’s personal data pursuant to this
subchapter;
(iii) be consumer friendly and easy to use by the average
consumer;
(iv) be as consistent as possible with any other similar platform,
technology, or mechanism required by any federal or State law or regulation;
and
(v) enable the controller to accurately determine whether the
consumer is a resident of this State and whether the consumer has made a
legitimate request to opt out of any sale of the consumer’s personal data or
targeted advertising.
(3) If a consumer’s decision to opt out of any processing of the
consumer’s personal data for the purposes of targeted advertising, or any sale
of the personal data, through an opt-out preference signal sent in accordance
with the provisions of subdivision (2)(C) of this subsection conflicts with the
consumer’s existing controller-specific privacy setting or voluntary
participation in a controller’s bona fide loyalty, rewards, premium features,
discounts, or club card program, the controller shall comply with the
consumer’s opt-out preference signal but may notify the consumer of the
conflict and provide to the consumer the choice to confirm the controller-
specific privacy setting or participation in the program.
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 37 of 54
2026
(4) If a controller responds to a consumer opt-out request received
pursuant to subdivision (2)(C) of this subsection by informing the consumer of
a charge for the use of any product or service, the controller shall present the
terms of any financial incentive offered pursuant to subdivision (b)(2) of this
section for the retention, use, sale, or sharing of the consumer’s personal data.
§ 2415f. PROCESSORS’ DUTIES; CONTRACTS BETWEEN
CONTROLLERS AND PROCESSORS
(a) Generally. A processor shall adhere to the instructions of a controller
and shall assist the controller in meeting the controller’s obligations under this
subchapter, including:
(1) taking into account the nature of processing and to the extent
possible, to fulfill the controller’s obligation to respond to consumer rights
requests pursuant to subsection 2415d(a) of this subchapter;
(2) taking into account the nature of processing and the information
available to the processor, by assisting the controller in meeting the
controller’s obligations in relation to the security of processing the personal
data and in relation to the notification of a data broker security breach or
security breach, as defined in section 2430 of this title, of the system of the
processor, in order to meet the controller’s obligations; and
(3) providing necessary information to enable the controller to conduct
and document data protection and impact assessments.
(b) Contractual terms.
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 38 of 54
2026
(1) A contract between a controller and a processor shall govern the
processor’s data processing procedures with respect to processing performed
on behalf of the controller.
(2) The contract shall be binding and clearly set forth instructions for
processing data, the nature and purpose of processing, the type of data subject
to processing, the duration of processing, and the rights and obligations of both
parties.
(3) The contract shall require that the processor:
(A) ensure that each person processing personal data is subject to a
duty of confidentiality with respect to the data;
(B) at the controller’s direction, delete or return all personal data to
the controller as requested at the end of the provision of services, unless
retention of the personal data is required by law;
(C) upon the reasonable request of the controller, make available to
the controller all information in its possession necessary to demonstrate the
processor’s compliance with the obligations in this subchapter;
(D) after providing the controller an opportunity to object, engage
any subcontractor pursuant to a written contract that requires the subcontractor
to meet the obligations of the processor with respect to the personal data; and
(E) make available to the controller upon the reasonable request of
the controller all information in the processor’s possession necessary to
demonstrate the processor’s compliance with this subchapter.
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 39 of 54
2026
(4) A processor shall provide a report of an assessment to the controller
upon request.
(c) Liabilities. This section shall not be construed to relieve a controller or
processor from the liabilities imposed on the controller or processor by virtue
of the controller’s or processor’s role in the processing relationship, as
described in this subchapter.
(d) Processors performing as controllers.
(1) Determining whether a person is acting as a controller or processor
with respect to a specific processing of data is a fact-based determination that
depends upon the context in which personal data are to be processed.
(2) A person who is not limited in the person’s processing of personal
data pursuant to a controller’s instructions, or who fails to adhere to the
instructions, is a controller and not a processor with respect to a specific
processing of data.
(3) A processor that continues to adhere to a controller’s instructions
with respect to a specific processing of personal data remains a processor.
(4) If a processor begins, alone or jointly with others, determining the
purposes and means of the processing of personal data, the processor is a
controller with respect to the processing and may be subject to an enforcement
action under section 2415j of this subchapter.
§ 2415g. DATA PROTECTION AND IMPACT ASSESSMENTS;
DISCLOSURE TO ATTORNEY GENERAL
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 40 of 54
2026
(a) Generally. A controller shall conduct and document a data protection
assessment for each of the controller’s processing activities that presents a
heightened risk of harm to a consumer, which for the purposes of this section
includes:
(1) the processing of personal data for the purposes of targeted
advertising;
(2) the sale of personal data;
(3) the processing of personal data for the purposes of profiling, if the
profiling presents a reasonably foreseeable risk of:
(A) unfair or deceptive treatment of, or unlawful disparate impact on,
a consumer;
(B) financial, physical, or reputational injury to a consumer;
(C) a physical or other intrusion upon the solitude or seclusion, or the
private affairs or concerns, of a consumer, if the intrusion would be offensive
to a reasonable person; or
(D) other substantial injury to a consumer; and
(4) the processing of sensitive data.
(b) Requirements.
(1) Data protection assessments conducted pursuant to subsection (a) of
this section shall identify and weigh the benefits that may flow, directly and
indirectly, from the processing to the controller, the consumer, other
stakeholders, and the public against the potential risks to the rights of the
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 41 of 54
2026
consumer associated with the processing, as mitigated by safeguards that can
be employed by the controller to reduce the risks.
(2) The controller shall factor into each data protection assessment the
use of deidentified data and the reasonable expectations of consumers, as well
as the context of the processing and the relationship between the controller and
the consumer whose personal data will be processed.
(c) Impact assessments for profiling. Each controller that engages in any
profiling for the purposes of making a decision that produces any legal or
similarly significant effect concerning a consumer shall conduct an impact
assessment for the profiling. The impact assessment shall include, to the
extent reasonably known by or available to the controller, as applicable:
(1) a statement by the controller disclosing the purpose, intended use
cases, and deployment context of, and benefits afforded by, the profiling;
(2) an analysis of whether the profiling poses any known or reasonably
foreseeable heightened risk of harm to a consumer, and, if so:
(A) the nature of such heightened risk of harm to a consumer; and
(B) the steps that have been taken to mitigate such heightened risk of
harm to a consumer;
(3) a description of:
(A) the main categories of personal data processed as inputs for the
purposes of such profiling; and
(B) the outputs such profiling produces;
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 42 of 54
2026
(4) an overview of the main categories of personal data the controller
used to customize the profiling, if the controller used data to customize the
profiling;
(5) any metrics used to evaluate the performance and known limitations
of the profiling;
(6) a description of any transparency measures taken concerning the
profiling, including any measures taken to disclose to consumers that the
controller is engaged in profiling while the controller is engaged in the
profiling; and
(7) a description of the postdeployment monitoring and user safeguards
provided concerning such profiling, including the oversight, use, and learning
processes established by the controller to address issues arising from such
profiling.
(d) Disclosure to Attorney General.
(1) The Attorney General may require that a controller disclose any data
protection or impact assessment that is relevant to an investigation conducted
by the Attorney General, and the controller shall make the data protection or
impact assessment available to the Attorney General.
(2) The Attorney General may evaluate the data protection or impact
assessment for compliance with the responsibilities set forth in this subchapter.
(3) Data protection and impact assessments shall be confidential and
shall be exempt from disclosure and copying under the Public Records Act.
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 43 of 54
2026
(4) To the extent any information contained in a data protection or
impact assessment disclosed to the Attorney General includes information
subject to attorney-client privilege or work product protection, the disclosure
shall not constitute a waiver of the privilege or protection.
(e) Assessment efficiency and applicability.
(1) A single data protection or impact assessment may address a
comparable set of processing operations that include similar activities.
(2) If a controller conducts a data protection or impact assessment for
the purpose of complying with another applicable law or regulation, the data
protection or impact assessment shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements
established in this section if the data protection or impact assessment is
reasonably similar in scope and effect to the data or impact protection
assessment that would otherwise be conducted pursuant to this section.
(3) Data protection and impact assessment requirements shall apply to
processing activities created or generated after January 1, 2028, and are not
retroactive.
§ 2415h. DEIDENTIFIED DATA
(a) Requirements. A controller in possession of deidentified data shall:
(1) take reasonable measures to ensure that the data cannot be associated
with an individual;
(2) publicly commit to maintaining and using deidentified data without
attempting to reidentify the data; and
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 44 of 54
2026
(3) contractually obligate any recipients of the deidentified data to
comply with the provisions of this subchapter.
(b) Limitations. This subchapter shall not be construed to:
(1) require a controller or processor to reidentify deidentified data or
pseudonymous data;
(2) maintain data in identifiable form, or collect, obtain, retain, or access
any data or technology, in order to be capable of associating an authenticated
consumer request with personal data; or
(3) require a controller or processor to comply with an authenticated
consumer rights request if the controller:
(A) is not reasonably capable of associating the request with the
personal data or it would be unreasonably burdensome for the controller to
associate the request with the personal data;
(B) does not use the personal data to recognize or respond to the
specific consumer who is the subject of the personal data, or associate the
personal data with other personal data about the same specific consumer; and
(C) does not sell the personal data to any third party or otherwise
voluntarily disclose the personal data to any third party other than a processor,
except as otherwise permitted in this section.
(c) Pseudonymous data. The rights afforded under subdivisions
2415d(a)(1)–(4) of this subchapter shall not apply to pseudonymous data in
cases in which the controller is able to demonstrate that any information
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 45 of 54
2026
necessary to identify the consumer is kept separately and is subject to effective
technical and organizational controls that prevent the controller from accessing
the information.
(d) Oversight when disclosing. A controller that discloses pseudonymous
data or deidentified data shall exercise reasonable oversight to monitor
compliance with any contractual commitments to which the pseudonymous
data or deidentified data is subject and shall take appropriate steps to address
any breaches of those contractual commitments.
§ 2415i. CONSTRUCTION OF DUTIES
(a) Generally. This subchapter shall not be construed to restrict a
controller’s, processor’s, or consumer health data controller’s ability to:
(1) comply with federal, state, or municipal laws, ordinances, or
regulations, except as prohibited by 1 V.S.A. § 150;
(2) comply with a civil, criminal, or regulatory inquiry, investigation,
subpoena, or summons by federal, state, municipal, or other governmental
authorities;
(3) cooperate with law enforcement agencies concerning conduct or
activity that the controller, processor, or consumer health data controller
reasonably and in good faith believes may violate federal, state, or municipal
laws, ordinances, or regulations;
(4) investigate, establish, exercise, prepare for, or defend legal claims;
(5) provide a product or service specifically requested by a consumer;
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 46 of 54
2026
(6) perform under a contract to which a consumer is a party, including
fulfilling the terms of a written warranty;
(7) take steps at the request of a consumer prior to entering into a
contract;
(8) take immediate steps to protect an interest that is essential for the life
or physical safety of the consumer or another individual, and if the processing
cannot be manifestly based on another legal basis;
(9) prevent, detect, protect against, or respond to security incidents,
identity theft, fraud, harassment, malicious or deceptive activities, or any
illegal activity; preserve the integrity or security of systems; or investigate,
report, or prosecute those responsible for the action;
(10) engage in public or peer-reviewed scientific or statistical research
in the public interest that adheres to all other applicable ethics and privacy laws
and is approved, monitored, and governed by an institutional review board that
determines, or similar independent oversight entities that determine:
(A) whether the deletion of the information is likely to provide
substantial benefits that do not exclusively accrue to the controller;
(B) the expected benefits of the research outweigh the privacy risks;
and
(C) whether the controller or consumer health data controller has
implemented reasonable safeguards to mitigate privacy risks associated with
research, including any risks associated with reidentification;
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 47 of 54
2026
(11) assist another controller, processor, consumer health data
controller, or third party with any of the obligations under this subchapter; or
(12) process personal data for reasons of public interest in the area of
public health, community health, or population health, but solely to the extent
that the processing is:
(A) subject to suitable and specific measures to safeguard the rights
of the consumer whose personal data are being processed; and
(B) under the responsibility of a professional subject to
confidentiality obligations under federal, state, or local law.
(b) Internal use of data. The obligations imposed on controllers,
processors, or consumer health data controllers under this subchapter shall not
restrict a controller’s, processor’s, or consumer health data controller’s ability
to collect, use, or retain data for internal use to:
(1) conduct internal research to develop, improve, or repair products,
services, or technology;
(2) effectuate a product recall;
(3) identify and repair technical errors that impair existing or intended
functionality;
(4) process personal data for the purposes of profiling in furtherance of
any automated decision that may produce any legal or similarly significant
effect concerning a consumer, provided the personal data are:
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 48 of 54
2026
(A) processed only to the extent necessary to detect or correct any
bias that may result from processing the data for such purposes, the bias cannot
effectively be detected or corrected without processing the data, and the data
are deleted once the processing has been completed;
(B) processed subject to appropriate safeguards to protect the rights
of consumers secured by the Constitution or laws of this State or of the United
States;
(C) subject to technical restrictions concerning the reuse of the data
and industry-standard security and privacy measures, including
pseudonymization;
(D) subject to measures to ensure that the data are secure, protected,
and subject to suitable safeguards, including strict controls concerning, and
documentation of, access to the data, to avoid misuse and ensure that only
authorized persons may access the data while preserving the confidentiality of
the data; and
(E) not transmitted, transferred, or otherwise accessed by any third
party;
(5) perform internal operations that are reasonably aligned with the
expectations of the consumer or reasonably anticipated based on the
consumer’s existing relationship with the controller or consumer health data
controller, or are otherwise compatible with processing data in furtherance of
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 49 of 54
2026
the provision of a product or service specifically requested by a consumer or
the performance of a contract to which the consumer is a party; or
(6) perform internal operations in accordance with the internal
operations exception established in COPPA if the controller, processor, or
consumer health data controller is processing data in accordance with the
exception.
(c) Evidentiary privilege.
(1) The obligations imposed on controllers, processors, or consumer
health data controllers under this subchapter shall not apply if compliance by
the controller, processor, or consumer health data controller with this
subchapter would violate an evidentiary privilege under the laws of this State.
(2) This subchapter shall not be construed to prevent a controller,
processor, or consumer health data controller from providing personal data
concerning a consumer to a person covered by an evidentiary privilege under
the laws of this State as part of a privileged communication.
(3) Nothing in this subchapter modifies 2020 Acts and Resolves No.
166, Sec. 14 or authorizes the use of facial recognition technology by law
enforcement.
(d) Third parties.
(1) A controller, processor, or consumer health data controller that
discloses personal data to a processor or third-party controller pursuant to this
subchapter shall not be deemed to have violated this subchapter if the
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 50 of 54
2026
processor or third-party controller that receives and processes the personal data
violates this subchapter, provided, at the time the disclosing controller,
processor, or consumer health data controller disclosed the personal data, the
disclosing controller, processor, or consumer health data controller did not
have actual knowledge that the receiving processor or third-party controller
would violate this subchapter.
(2) A third-party controller or processor receiving personal data from a
controller, processor, or consumer health data controller in compliance with
this subchapter is not in violation of this subchapter for the transgressions of
the controller, processor, or consumer health data controller from which the
third-party controller or processor receives the personal data.
(e) Clarifications. This subchapter shall not be construed to:
(1) impose any obligation on a controller or processor that adversely
affects the rights or freedoms of any person, including the rights of any person:
(A) to freedom of speech or freedom of the press guaranteed in the
First Amendment to the U.S. Constitution; or
(B) under 12 V.S.A. § 1615;
(2) apply to any person’s processing of personal data in the course of the
person’s purely personal or household activities; or
(3) require an independent school as defined in 16 V.S.A. § 11(a)(8) or a
private institution of higher education, as defined in 20 U.S.C. § 1001 et seq.,
to delete personal data or opt out of processing of personal data that would
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 51 of 54
2026
unreasonably interfere with the provision of education services by or the
ordinary operation of the school or institution.
(f) Personal data processing.
(1) Personal data processed by a controller or consumer health data
controller pursuant to this section may be processed to the extent that the
processing is:
(A) reasonably necessary and proportionate to the purposes listed in
this section; and
(B) adequate, relevant, and limited to what is necessary in relation to
the specific purposes listed in this section.
(2)(A) The collection, use, or retention of personal data pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section shall, where applicable, take into account the
nature and purpose or purposes of the collection, use, or retention.
(B) The data shall be subject to reasonable administrative, technical,
and physical measures to protect the confidentiality, integrity, and accessibility
of the personal data and to reduce reasonably foreseeable risks of harm to
consumers relating to the collection, use, or retention of personal data.
(3) If a controller or consumer health data controller processes personal
data pursuant to an exemption in this section, the controller or consumer health
data controller bears the burden of demonstrating that the processing qualifies
for the exemption and complies with the requirements of this subsection.
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 52 of 54
2026
(4) Processing personal data for the purposes expressly identified in this
section shall not solely make a legal entity a controller or consumer health data
controller with respect to the processing.
§ 2415j. ATTORNEY GENERAL ENFORCEMENT; REPORTING
(a) Consumer Protection Act. A violation of this subchapter shall be
deemed a violation of the Vermont Consumer Protection Act, pursuant to
chapter 63 of this title. The Attorney General has the same authority to enforce
this subchapter as provided under 9 V.S.A. chapter 63, subchapter 1. This
subchapter shall not be construed as providing the basis for, or be subject to, a
private right of action for violations of this subchapter or any other law.
(b) Reporting. Annually, on or before December 1, the Attorney General
shall submit a report to the General Assembly disclosing:
(1) the number of notices of violation pursuant to this subchapter that
the Attorney General has issued;
(2) the nature of each violation;
(3) the number of violations that resulted in an enforcement action being
taken;
(4) the number of enforcement actions that proceeded to trial;
(5) whether and to what extent the Attorney General has offered an
opportunity for a controller or processor to cure a violation; and
(6) any other matter the Attorney General deems relevant for the
purposes of the report.
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 53 of 54
2026
(c) Guidance. The Attorney General shall provide, and update as
necessary, guidance to controllers and processors for compliance with the
terms of the Vermont Data Privacy and Online Surveillance Act.
§ 2415k. CONSUMER HEALTH DATA PRIVACY
A person shall not:
(1) provide any employee or contractor with access to consumer health
data unless the employee or contractor is subject to a contractual or statutory
duty of confidentiality;
(2) provide any processor with access to consumer health data unless the
person and processor comply with section 2415f of this subchapter;
(3) use a geofence to establish a virtual boundary that is within 1,850
feet of any health care facility, including any mental health facility or
reproductive or sexual health facility, for the purpose of identifying, tracking,
collecting data from, or sending any notification to a consumer regarding the
consumer’s consumer health data; or
(4) sell, or offer to sell, consumer health data without first obtaining the
consumer’s consent.
Sec. 2. DATA PRIVACY; INTENT; ENFORCEMENT; EDUCATION
(a) Enforcement intent. Through this act, the General Assembly makes the
decision to not provide consumers with a right to hold persons accountable in
civil court for violations of the Vermont Data Privacy and Online Surveillance
Act. Consequently, the Office of the Attorney General will bear the burden of
VT LEG #390229 v.1

No. 145 Page 54 of 54
2026
enforcing the Act and ensuring, to the best of its abilities, that the rights of
Vermonters will be protected. In prohibiting a private right of action, it is the
intent of the General Assembly that additional appropriations and resources
will be provided in the following years to support the Office of the Attorney
General’s enforcement of this Act, which may require the creation of a data
privacy unit. If such appropriations or resources are not provided, the General
Assembly may consider adding a private right of action for consumers.
(b) Educational intent. It is also the intent of the General Assembly that
appropriate educational resources and sufficient technical support will be
provided by the State in the following years to help Vermont businesses
comply with the Act.
Sec. 3. DATA PRIVACY; ENFORCEMENT; CURE PERIOD
During the period beginning January 1, 2028, and ending on June 30, 2029,
the Attorney General shall, prior to initiating any action for a violation of the
Vermont Data Privacy and Online Surveillance Act, issue a notice of violation
to the alleged violator if the Attorney General determines that a cure is
possible. If the person fails to cure the violation within 60 days after receipt of
the notice of violation, the Attorney General may bring an action pursuant to
9 V.S.A. § 2415j(a).
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on January 1, 2028.
Date Governor signed bill: June 16, 2026
VT LEG #390229 v.1